Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-538
Hunting game birds from vehicle; violation; penalty.

Except as provided in section 37-420 and except for a disabled person holding a special permit to hunt and fish from a vehicle issued under section 37-421, it shall be unlawful to hunt any game birds from a vehicle of any kind. Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall be fined at least fifty dollars.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 258;

Laws 2005, LB 162, § 20.